zh-TW: 雞蛋加工狀態: 水煮; 皮蛋; 熟蛋黃; 新鮮; 醃製; 鹹蛋; 其他
sl-SI: Stanje predelave jajc: Kuhano; Stoletno jajce; Kuhan rumenjak; Sveže; Vloženo; Soljeno; Drugo
fr: État de transformation des œufs: Bouilli; Œuf de cent ans; Jaune cuit; Frais; Mariné; Salé; Autre
zh-CN: 鸡蛋加工状态: 水煮; 皮蛋; 熟蛋黄; 新鲜; 腌制; 咸蛋; 其他
it: stato di lavorazione delle uova: Bollito; Uovo centenario; Tuorlo cotto; Fresco; In salamoia; Salato; Altro
de: Verarbeitungszustand der Eier: Gekocht; Tausendjähriges Ei; Gekochtes Eigelb; Frisch; Eingelegt; Gesalzen; Sonstige
tr: Yumurta işleme durumu: Haşlanmış; Yüzyıl yumurtası; Pişmiş sarı; Taze; Salamura; Tuzlanmış; Diğer
th: สถานะการแปรรูปไข่: ต้ม; ไข่เยี่ยวม้า; ไข่แดงสุก; สด; ดอง; เค็ม; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Състояние на обработката на яйца: Варени; Столетно яйце; Готвен жълтък; Пресни; Мариновани; Осолени; Друго
pt-BR: Estado de processamento dos ovos: Cozido; Ovo centenário; Gema cozida; Fresco; Em conserva; Salgado; Outro
es: Estado de procesamiento de huevos: Hervido; Huevo centenario; Yema cocida; Fresco; Encurtido; Salado; Otro
pl: Stan przetworzenia jaj: Gotowane; Stuletnie jajo; Ugotowane żółtko; Świeże; Marynowane; Solone; Inne
el: Κατάσταση επεξεργασίας αυγών: Βραστό; Αυγό εκατό ετών; Μαγειρεμένος κρόκος; Φρέσκο; Τουρσί; Αλατισμένο; Άλλο
hu: Tojásfeldolgozási állapot: Főtt; Száznapos tojás; Főtt tojássárgája; Friss; Savanyított; Sózott; Egyéb
sk-SK: Stav spracovania vajec: Varené; Storočné vajce; Varený žĺtok; Čerstvé; Nakladané; Solené; Iné
da: Status for æggeforarbejdning: Kogt; Tusindårsæg; Tilberedt blomme; Frisk; Syltet; Saltet; Andet
en: Egg processing state: Boiled; Century egg; Cooked yolk; Fresh; Pickled; Salted; Other
lt-LT: Kiaušinių apdorojimo būsena: Virta; Šimtametis kiaušinis; Virtas trynys; Šviežia; Marinuota; Sūdyta; Kita
ro-RO: Starea de procesare a ouălor: Fiert; Ou de o sută de ani; Gălbenuș fiert; Proaspăt; Murat; Sărat; Altele
nb: Eggforedlingsstatus: Kokt; Tusenårsegg; Kokt eggeplomme; Fersk; Syltet; Saltet; Annet
ru: Состояние обработки яиц: Вареное; Столетнее яйцо; Вареный желток; Свежее; Маринованное; Соленое; Другое
ja: 卵加工状態: ゆで; ピータン; 加熱済み卵黄; 生; 酢漬け; 塩漬け; その他
vi: Tình trạng chế biến trứng: Luộc; Trứng bắc thảo; Lòng đỏ chín; Tươi; Ngâm chua; Muối; Khác
cs: Stav zpracování vajec: Vařené; Stoleté vejce; Vařený žloutek; Čerstvé; Nakládané; Solené; Jiné
nl: Ei verwerkingstoestand: Gekookt; Duizendjarig ei; Gekookte eidooier; Vers; Ingelegd; Gezouten; Overige
ko: 달걀 가공 상태: 삶음; 피단; 익힌 노른자; 신선; 초절임; 염장; 기타
fi: Munien käsittelytila: Keitetty; Tuhatvuotinen muna; Kypsennetty keltuainen; Tuore; Pikkelöity; Suolattu; Muu
pt-PT: Estado de processamento de ovos: Cozido; Ovo centenário; Gema cozida; Fresco; Em conserva; Salgado; Outro
sv: Äggbearbetningsstatistik: Kokt; Tusenårigt ägg; Tillagad äggula; Färsk; Inlagt; Saltat; Övrigt
hr-HR: Stanje obrade jaja: Kuhano; Stoljetno jaje; Kuhani žumanjak; Svježe; Ukiseljeno; Posoljeno; Ostalo